Utah statutes.
78B-3-307.   All other actions.

(1)  In all other cases an action shall be tried in the county in which:

(a)  the cause of action arises; or

(b)  any defendant resides at the commencement of the action.

(2)  If the defendant is a corporation, any county in which the corporation has its principal office or a place of business shall be considered the county in which the corporation resides.

(3)  If none of the defendants resides in this state, the action may be commenced and tried in any county designated by the plaintiff in the complaint.

(4)  If the defendant is about to depart from the state, the action may be tried in any county where any of the parties resides or service is had.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

